Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-1120
Pre-need seller; failure to perform obligations; director; powers.

The director may collect the proceeds of any letter of credit, surety bond, or trust funds held pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of section 12-1113 upon the failure of the pre-need seller to perform the obligations secured thereby. Thereafter, in the director's discretion, he or she may use such proceeds to secure completion of the mausoleum, columbarium, or lawn crypt or take any actions necessary to reimburse all pre-need purchasers of a crypt or niche therein to the extent of money paid or consideration given by the pre-need purchasers.

Laws 1986, LB 643, § 20.